Tennessee statutes. Title 24 Evidence and Witnesses
Chapter 2

Attendance of Witnesses

24-2-101. Duty to attend.

Every witness legally bound to appear as herein directed shall appear accordingly and continue to attend from day to day, and from term to term, until discharged by the court or the party who sought the summons; provided, that the continuance of a case shall not be deemed a discharge of witnesses legally bound to appear in the case so continued, and in the event of a continuance, it shall not be necessary to resummon such witnesses unless they are expressly discharged by the court or by the party at whose instance they were summoned.

Code 1858, § 3820 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 29); Shan., § 5608; Code 1932, § 9790; Acts 1959, ch. 113, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-207.

Cross-References. Contempt of court, title 29, ch. 9.

Federal prisoner as witness in state criminal proceedings, §40-17-212.

Prisoner as witness in criminal proceedings outside state in which incarcerated, §40-17-211.

Subpoena, personal attendance, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 45.05.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Witnesses, §§ 3, 4.

24-2-102. Penalty for failure to appear.

In default thereof, a witness forfeits to the party at whose insistence the subpoena issues, the sum of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125), to be recovered by scire facias; and is further liable to the action of the party for the full damages sustained for want of such witness' testimony.

Code 1858, § 3821 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 29); Shan., § 5609; Code 1932, § 9791; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-208.

Cross-References. Contempt of court, title 29, ch. 9.

Failure to attend hearing on back assessment of property, §67-1-1006(b).

Subpoena of witnesses, §16-15-708.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 1-45.01-1, 1-45.06-1.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Witnesses, §§ 5, 6.

24-2-103. Scire facias by circuit court.

If a witness fails to appear when summoned before a judge of the court of general sessions, notary public, or commissioner, the subpoena is returned to the circuit court of the county, with the endorsement of such failure made thereon by the judge of the court of general sessions, notary public, or commissioner, and scire facias issues, as in other cases.

Code 1858, § 3825; Shan., § 5613; mod. Code 1932, § 9795; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-210; T.C.A., §24-2-104.

Compiler's Notes. Former §24-2-103, concerning proceedings against witness on scire facias, was transferred to §24-2-106 in 2000.

Cross-References. Failure to appear before arbitrator, §29-5-109.

24-2-104. Scire facias by general sessions judge.

The party at whose instance a witness is summoned before a judge of the court of general sessions, on the trial of a cause, instead of having the subpoena returned to court as in §24-2-103, may elect to move before the judge of the court of general sessions for judgment against the witness, in which case a conditional judgment shall be given for twenty-five dollars ($25.00), and scire facias shall issue to the witness to show cause why final judgment shall not be entered, and, on failure to show cause, final judgment shall be rendered for the penalty and costs.

Code 1858, § 3826 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 145, § 1); Shan., § 5614; Code 1932, § 9796; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-211; T.C.A., §24-2-105.

Compiler's Notes. Former §24-2-104, concerning scire facias by circuit court, was transferred to §24-2-103 in 2000.

24-2-105. Privilege against process.

During the attendance of any person summoned as a witness, and during the time that such person is going to and returning from the place of such attendance, allowing one (1) day for every thirty (30) miles of travel, no writ, process, warrant, order, judgment, or decree in any civil cause, subpoena to testify as a witness only excepted, shall be served upon such person.

Code 1858, § 3828 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 34); Shan., § 5616; Code 1932, § 9798; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-213; T.C.A., §24-2-106.

Compiler's Notes. Former §24-2-105, concerning scire facias by general sessions judge, was transferred to §24-2-104 in 2000.

Cross-References. Exemption of jurors, §22-1-103.

Garnishee as witness, §§26-2-204,26-2-205.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Abatement, Survival and Revival, § 13; 21 Tenn. Juris., Process, § 3; 25 Tenn. Juris., Witnesses, § 52.

Law Reviews.

Pleadings, Motions and Pre-Trial Procedure, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 219.

Procedure — Personal Jurisdiction, 35 Tenn. L. Rev. 560.

Recent Developments in Tennessee and Federal Procedure (Donald F. Paine), 36 Tenn. L. Rev. 276.

24-2-106. Proceedings against witness on scire facias.

Upon return of the scire facias issued for the penalty, the witness may be relieved by showing sufficient cause for failing to attend; otherwise, on motion, judgment will be given against the witness and execution issue accordingly.

Code 1858, § 3822 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 29); Shan., § 5611; Code 1932, § 9793; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 24-209; T.C.A., §24-2-103.

Compiler's Notes. Former §24-2-106, concerning privilege against process, was transferred to §24-2-105 in 2000.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Process, § 3; 25 Tenn. Juris., Witnesses, § 4.

24-2-107. Subpoenas — Conflicts with Rules of Civil Procedure.

Rule 45 of the Rules of Civil Procedure shall govern when a clerk or other authorized officer is required to issue a subpoena in a civil case in circuit court and the consequences of a person's refusal to appear, testify or produce evidence when subpoenaed pursuant to such rule. If any local rule of court conflicts with Rule 45, Rule 45 shall prevail, and the clerk or other authorized officer shall issue subpoenas and the judge shall punish the refusal to respond to subpoenas in accordance with such rule.

Acts 1997, ch. 377, § 2.

24-2-108. Language required in subpoena.

Each subpoena issued should at a minimum contain explicit language that states:

A party being served must appear and that failure to appear may put such party in contempt of court; and

The penalties such party may face by being held in contempt of court.

Acts 2004, ch. 761, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 761, § 2 provided that the provisions of the act do not apply to subpoena forms printed prior to May 24, 2004.

24-2-109. Educator as witness in domestic dispute matter.

As used in this section, “educator” means any person who is currently employed at any public or private elementary or secondary school in this state:

As a teacher with an active teaching license; or

As a school counselor.

Notwithstanding any other law, a court shall not require an educator to be a witness in any civil hearing, deposition, mediation, arbitration, trial, or other similar proceeding involving a domestic dispute matter, including, but not limited to, domestic abuse, as defined by § 36-3-601, divorce, parentage, or child custody, if the educator is not a named party and the educator's attendance would require the educator to be absent from teaching, counseling, or supervisory duties in a school, unless the court determines that the educator's attendance is necessary to ensure fairness in the hearing, mediation, arbitration, trial, or other similar matter.

Acts 2018, ch. 747, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 747, § 2. April 18, 2018.